.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SFX 127   хаться шешься       хаться
SFX 127   хаться шется        хаться
SFX 127   хаться шетесь       хаться
SFX 127   хаться шемся        хаться
SFX 127   хать шут          хать
SFX 127   хать шу           хать
SFX 127   хать шешь         хать
SFX 127   хать шете         хать
SFX 127   хать шет          хать
SFX 127   хать шем          хать
SFX 127   еться ятся         [дрт]еться
SFX 127   еться люсь         петься
SFX 127   еться ишься        [дрт]еться
SFX 127   еться ится         [дрт]еться
SFX 127   еться итесь        [дрт]еться
SFX 127   еться имся         [дрт]еться
SFX 127   еться юсь          реться
SFX 127   еть  ят           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 127   еть  лю           петь
SFX 127   еть  ишь          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 127   еть  ите          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 127   еть  ит           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 127   еть  им           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 127   еть  ю            реть
SFX 127   есть тут          честь
SFX 127   есть ту           честь
SFX 127   есть тешь         честь
SFX 127   есть тете         честь
SFX 127   есть тет          честь
SFX 127   есть тем          честь
SFX 127   есть тёшь         честь
SFX 127   есть тёте         честь
SFX 127   есть тёт          честь
SFX 127   есть тём          честь
SFX 127   есть ядут         сесть
SFX 127   есть яду          сесть
SFX 127   есть ядешь        сесть
SFX 127   есть ядете        сесть
SFX 127   есть ядет         сесть
SFX 127   есть ядем         сесть
SFX 127   деться жусь         деться
SFX 127   деть жу           деть
SFX 127   аться утся         рваться
SFX 127   аться утся         осаться
SFX 127   аться усь          рваться
SFX 127   аться усь          осаться
SFX 127   аться ятся         спаться
SFX 127   аться люсь         спаться
SFX 127   аться ишься        жаться
SFX 127   аться ишься        спаться
SFX 127   аться ится         жаться
SFX 127   аться ится         спаться
SFX 127   аться итесь        жаться
SFX 127   аться итесь        спаться
SFX 127   аться имся         жаться
SFX 127   аться имся         спаться
SFX 127   аться ешься        рваться
SFX 127   аться ешься        осаться
SFX 127   аться ется         рваться
SFX 127   аться ется         осаться
SFX 127   аться етесь        рваться
SFX 127   аться етесь        осаться
SFX 127   аться емся         рваться
SFX 127   аться емся         осаться
SFX 127   аться ёшься        рваться
SFX 127   аться ёшься        осаться
SFX 127   аться ётся         рваться
SFX 127   аться ётся         осаться
SFX 127   аться ётесь        рваться
SFX 127   аться ётесь        осаться
SFX 127   аться ёмся         рваться
SFX 127   аться ёмся         осаться
SFX 127   ать  ут           рвать
SFX 127   ать  ут           осать
SFX 127   ать  у            рвать
SFX 127   ать  у            осать
SFX 127   ать  ят           спать
SFX 127   ать  лю           спать
SFX 127   ать  ишь          жать
SFX 127   ать  ишь          спать
SFX 127   ать  ите          жать
SFX 127   ать  ите          спать
SFX 127   ать  ит           жать
SFX 127   ать  ит           спать
SFX 127   ать  им           жать
SFX 127   ать  им           спать
SFX 127   ать  ешь          рвать
SFX 127   ать  ешь          осать
SFX 127   ать  ете          рвать
SFX 127   ать  ете          осать
SFX 127   ать  ет           рвать
SFX 127   ать  ет           осать
SFX 127   ать  ем           рвать
SFX 127   ать  ем           осать
SFX 127   ать  ёшь          рвать
SFX 127   ать  ёшь          осать
SFX 127   ать  ёте          рвать
SFX 127   ать  ёте          осать
SFX 127   ать  ёт           рвать
SFX 127   ать  ёт           осать
SFX 127   ать  ём           рвать
SFX 127   ать  ём           осать

SFX 128 Y 4
SFX 128   ый   о            [лнртв]ый
SFX 128   ий   о            ький
SFX 128   ий   и            [цс]кий
SFX 128   ий   е            щий

SFX 129 Y 4
SFX 129   ый   о            [лнртв]ый
SFX 129   ий   о            ький
SFX 129   ий   и            [цс]кий
SFX 129   ий   е            щий

SFX 130 Y 4
SFX 130   0     rs         e
SFX 130   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 130   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 130   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX 131 Y 4
SFX 131   0     rs         e
SFX 131   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 131   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 131   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX 132 Y 4
SFX 132   ый   о            [лнртв]ый
SFX 132   ий   о            ький
SFX 132   ий   и            [цс]кий
SFX 132   ий   е            щий
